Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB121.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7725 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7725. Operation by persons under age sixteen.* * *(c.1) Examination.--An examination for a safety certificate under subsection (c)(3) shall be offered in person at no less than one physical location in each county of this Commonwealth as approved by the department.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415